Missouri, session 2026, HB1941.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 376, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
known as section 376.448, to read as follows:
376.448. 1. As used in this section, the following terms mean:
(1) "Cost-sharing", any co-payment, coinsurance, deductible, amount paid by
an enrollee for health care services in excess of a coverage limitation, or similar charge
required by or on behalf of an enrollee in order to receive a specific health care service
covered by a health benefit plan, whether covered under medical benefits or pharmacy
benefits. The term "cost-sharing" shall include cost-sharing as defined in 42 U.S.C.
Section 18022(c);
(2) "Enrollee", the same meaning given to the term in section 376.1350;
(3) "Generic drug", the same meaning given to the term in 42 CFR 423.4;
(4) "Health benefit plan", the same meaning given to the term in section
376.1350;
(5) "Health care service", the same meaning given to the term in section
376.1350;
(6) "Health carrier", the same meaning given to the term in section 376.1350;
(7) "Pharmacy benefits manager", the same meaning given to the term in section
376.388.
2. When calculating an enrollee's overall contribution to any out-of-pocket
maximum or any cost-sharing requirement under a health benefit plan, a health carrier
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HCS HBs 1941, 2279 & 1681 2
or pharmacy benefits manager shall include any amounts paid by the enrollee or paid
on behalf of the enrollee for any medication where a generic drug substitute for such
medication is not available.
3. A health carrier or pharmacy benefits manager shall not vary an enrollee's
out-of-pocket maximum or any cost-sharing requirement based on, or otherwise design
benefits in a manner that takes into account, the availability of any cost-sharing
assistance program for any medication where a generic drug substitute for such
medication is not available.
4. If, under federal law, application of the requirement under subsection 2 of this
section would result in health savings account ineligibility under Section 223 of the
Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, the requirement under subsection 2 of this
section shall apply to health savings account-qualified high deductible health plans with
respect to any cost-sharing of such a plan after the enrollee has satisfied the minimum
deductible under Section 223, except with respect to items or services that are
preventive care under Section 223(c)(2)(C) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as
amended, in which case the requirement of subsection 2 of this section shall apply
regardless of whether the minimum deductible under Section 223 has been satisfied.
5. Nothing in this section shall prohibit a health carrier or health benefit plan
from utilizing step therapy in accordance with section 376.2034.
6. The provisions of this section shall not apply to health benefit plans that are
covered under the Labor Management Relations Act of 1947, 29 U.S.C. Section 141 et
seq., as amended.
7. The provisions of this section shall apply to health benefit plans entered into,
amended, extended, or renewed on or after August 28, 2026.
8. No changes to the provisions of the Employee Retirement Income Security Act
of 1974 as codified in 29 U.S.C. Chapter 18 and in effect on January 1, 2026, shall alter
or in any way weaken the exemption in subsection 6 of this section.
9. As specified in subsection 3 of this section, the provisions of this section shall
only apply to the instances where a generic drug substitute for the medication is not
available.
✔